District of Columbia statutes.
32-708

Recordkeeping requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall maintain adequate records of declarations of domestic partnership, termination statements, and amendments to declarations of domestic partnership and termination statements.

(b)

The Mayor shall report annually to the Council on:

(1)

The number of domestic partnerships declared and terminated; and

(2)

Utilization of domestic partnership benefits by District government employees.

History

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-114, § 9, 39 DCR 2861

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-702.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1407.